Utah statutes.
76-5-305.   Defenses.
It is a defense under this part that:
(1)  the actor was acting under a reasonable belief that:
(a)  the conduct was necessary to protect any person from imminent bodily
injury or death; or
(b)  the detention or restraint was authorized by law; or
(2)  the alleged victim is younger than 18 years of age or is mentally
incompetent, and the actor was acting under a reasonable belief that the
custodian, guardian, legal guardian, custodial parent, or person acting in
loco parentis to the victim would, if present, have consented to the actor's
conduct.
